Missouri, session 2026, HB1902.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 393.1025, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 393.1025, to read as follows:
393.1025. As used in sections 393.1020 to 393.1030, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the public service commission;
(2) "Department", the department of economic development;
(3) "Electric utility", any electrical corporation as defined by section 386.020;
(4) "Renewable energy credit" or "REC", a tradeable certificate of proof that one
megawatt-hour of electricity has been generated from renewable energy sources; and
(5) "Renewable energy resources", electric energy produced from wind, solar thermal
sources, photovoltaic cells and panels, dedicated crops grown for energy production,
cellulosic agricultural residues, plant residues, methane from landfills, from agricultural
operations, or from wastewater treatment, thermal depolymerization or pyrolysis for
converting waste material to energy, clean and untreated wood such as pallets, hydropower
[(not] including pumped storage[)] that does not require a new diversion or impoundment of
water and that has a nameplate rating of ten megawatts or less, fuel cells using hydrogen
produced by one of the above-named renewable energy sources, and other sources of energy
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1902 2
not including nuclear that become available after November 4, 2008, and are certified as
renewable by rule by the department.
✔